District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

1-1104.03

Constituent services.

Repealed.

History

Aug. 14, 1974, 88 Stat. 461, Pub. L. 93-376, title IV, § 402
Oct. 10, 1975, D.C. Law 1-21, § 7(b), 22 DCR 2069
Oct. 30, 1975, D.C. Law 1-27, § 3(c), 22 DCR 2471
Sept. 2, 1976, D.C. Law 1-79, title VII, § 702, 23 DCR 2050
Apr. 23, 1977, D.C. Law 1-126, title I, § 102(d), 24 DCR 2372
Mar. 16, 1982, D.C. Law 4-88, § 3(h), (r), 29 DCR 458
Jan. 28, 1988, D.C. Law 7-66, § 2, 34 DCR 7439
Apr. 12, 2000, D.C. Law 13-91, § 124(b), 47 DCR 520
Apr. 24, 2007, D.C. Law 16-305, § 7, 53 DCR 6198
Sept. 23, 2009, D.C. Law 18-52, § 2, 56 DCR 5491
April 27, 2012, D.C. Law 19-124, § 501(d), 59 DCR 1862

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-1443.
1973 Ed., § 1-1162.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see § 401(d) of Board of Ethics and Government Accountability Establishment and Comprehensive Ethics Reform Emergency Amendment Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-298, January 29, 2012, 59 DCR 683).